src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The Southern Lushootseed morphophonological/twolc rules file !
!! =================================== !

Alphabet
 a b c d ə g h i k l m n p q s t u w x y

 ú ù í ì á à
 e f j o r v z
 é ó é ò â ê ô û î ã ý


!! The Southern Puget Sound Salish language is written in lower case only. Foreign names, however,
!! are capitalized https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/ISO_639:s vs https://iso639-3.sil.org/code/slh

 A B C D G H I K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y
 E F J V Z
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý

!! This transformation, accent loss, will be moved to post dict. 2022-12-25
á:a
ú:u
í:i
ə́:ə
à:a
ù:u
ì:i
ə̀:ə

b̓

c̓ !! c U+0313
č
č̓
dᶻ 
ə
gʷ 
ǰ

k̓ 
kʷ 
k̓ʷ 

l̕ 
ɬ
ƛ̕

m̓
n̓

p̓

q
q̓
qʷ
q̓ʷ

š

t̕

w̓
y̓

x̌
xʷ
x̌ʷ

ʔ
!! Southern Lushootseed is written in IPA, there are no upper-case letters
%{lØ%}:0   !!= * @CODE@ in slh stem-final l tends to be lost, but it is retained before Clt/Now
! remove this from expected 2024-07-06 %{lØ%}:l
!! there are six placeholders

%{p6%}:b
%{p6%}:b̓
%{p6%}:c
%{p6%}:c̓
%{p6%}:č
%{p6%}:č̓
%{p6%}:d
%{p6%}:dᶻ
%{p6%}:g
%{p6%}:gʷ
%{p6%}:ǰ
%{p6%}:k
%{p6%}:k̓
%{p6%}:kʷ
%{p6%}:k̓ʷ
%{p6%}:l
%{p6%}:l̕
%{p6%}:ɬ
%{p6%}:ƛ̕
%{p6%}:m
%{p6%}:m̓
%{p6%}:n
%{p6%}:n̓
%{p6%}:p
%{p6%}:p̓
%{p6%}:q
%{p6%}:q̓
%{p6%}:qʷ
%{p6%}:q̓ʷ
%{p6%}:š
%{p6%}:t
%{p6%}:t̕
%{p6%}:w
%{p6%}:w̓
%{p6%}:y
%{p6%}:y̓
%{p6%}:x̌
%{p6%}:xʷ
%{p6%}:x̌ʷ
%{p6%}:ʔ

%{p5%}:a
%{p5%}:i
!%{p5%}:o
%{p5%}:u
!%{p5%}:á
!%{p5%}:ú
!%{p5%}:í
!%{p5%}:ə́
%{p5%}:ə


%{p4%}:b
%{p4%}:b̓
%{p4%}:c
%{p4%}:c̓
%{p4%}:č
%{p4%}:č̓
%{p4%}:d
%{p4%}:dᶻ
%{p4%}:g
%{p4%}:gʷ
%{p4%}:ǰ
%{p4%}:k
%{p4%}:k̓
%{p4%}:kʷ
%{p4%}:k̓ʷ
%{p4%}:l
%{p4%}:l̕
%{p4%}:ɬ
%{p4%}:ƛ̕
%{p4%}:m
%{p4%}:m̓
%{p4%}:n
%{p4%}:n̓
%{p4%}:p
%{p4%}:p̓
%{p4%}:q
%{p4%}:q̓
%{p4%}:qʷ
%{p4%}:q̓ʷ
%{p4%}:š
%{p4%}:t
%{p4%}:t̕
%{p4%}:w
%{p4%}:w̓
%{p4%}:y
%{p4%}:y̓
%{p4%}:x̌
%{p4%}:xʷ
%{p4%}:x̌ʷ
%{p4%}:ʔ

%{p3%}:b
%{p3%}:b̓
%{p3%}:c
%{p3%}:c̓
%{p3%}:č
%{p3%}:č̓
%{p3%}:d
%{p3%}:dᶻ
%{p3%}:g
%{p3%}:gʷ
%{p3%}:ǰ
%{p3%}:k
%{p3%}:k̓
%{p3%}:kʷ
%{p3%}:k̓ʷ
%{p3%}:l
%{p3%}:l̕
%{p3%}:ɬ
%{p3%}:ƛ̕
%{p3%}:m
%{p3%}:m̓
%{p3%}:n
%{p3%}:n̓
%{p3%}:p
%{p3%}:p̓
%{p3%}:q
%{p3%}:q̓
%{p3%}:qʷ
%{p3%}:q̓ʷ
%{p3%}:š
%{p3%}:t
%{p3%}:t̕
%{p3%}:w
%{p3%}:w̓
%{p3%}:y
%{p3%}:y̓
%{p3%}:x̌
%{p3%}:xʷ
%{p3%}:x̌ʷ
%{p3%}:ʔ

%{p2%}:a
%{p2%}:i
!%{p2%}:o
%{p2%}:u
!%{p2%}:á
!%{p2%}:ú
!%{p2%}:í
!%{p2%}:ə́
%{p2%}:ə


%{p1%}:b
%{p1%}:b̓
%{p1%}:c
%{p1%}:c̓
%{p1%}:č
%{p1%}:č̓
%{p1%}:d
%{p1%}:dᶻ
%{p1%}:g
%{p1%}:gʷ
%{p1%}:ǰ
%{p1%}:k
%{p1%}:k̓
%{p1%}:kʷ
%{p1%}:k̓ʷ
%{p1%}:l
%{p1%}:l̕
%{p1%}:ɬ
%{p1%}:ƛ̕
%{p1%}:m
%{p1%}:m̓
%{p1%}:n
%{p1%}:n̓
%{p1%}:p
%{p1%}:p̓
%{p1%}:q
%{p1%}:q̓
%{p1%}:qʷ
%{p1%}:q̓ʷ
%{p1%}:š
%{p1%}:t
%{p1%}:t̕
%{p1%}:w
%{p1%}:w̓
%{p1%}:y
%{p1%}:y̓
%{p1%}:x̌
%{p1%}:xʷ
%{p1%}:x̌ʷ
%{p1%}:ʔ

%{pØ%}:a
%{pØ%}:i
!%{pØ%}:o
%{pØ%}:u
!%{pØ%}:á
!%{pØ%}:ú
!%{pØ%}:í
!%{pØ%}:ə́
%{pØ%}:ə



! 3-segment reduplication
R31:b R31:l

R32:l
E3:ə
!! place holders
%{pØ%}:0
%{p1%}:0
%{p2%}:0
%{p3%}:0
%{p4%}:0
%{p5%}:0
%{p6%}:0
%{p7%}:0

! triggers
%^Red1i123:0 !!= * @CODE@ qəlb: qiqəlb **rain showers**
%^Red1i13:0 !!= * @CODE@ 2-segment to 3-segments with vowel change
%^Red12q13:0 !!= * @CODE@
%^Red1213:0 !!= * @CODE@
%^Red1iq13:0 !!= * @CODE@ iʔ
%^Red1iq123:0 !!= * @CODE@ iʔ biʔbədəʔs
%^Red12123:0 !!= * @CODE@ papastəd
%^RedPL1i1i13:0 !!= * @CODE@ 2-segment to 3-segments with vowel change Plural
%^Red12323:0 !!= * @CODE@ works with Red3 and Red5

%^Red12323123:0 !!= * @CODE@ Distributive augmentative?

%^RedPL123123:0 !!= * @CODE@ 3-segment reduplication 

%^RedPL130130:0 !!= * @CODE@ ƛ̕xʷay: ƛ̕xʷaƛ̕xʷay 

%^Pen:0 !!= * @CODE@ this combines with subsequent RmVow or perhaps RmCns
%^RmVOW:0 !!= * @CODE@ this removes previous vowel or with Pen the penultimate vowel
%^d2t:0 !!= * @CODE@ this devoices d to t specifically



! Morpheme boundaries:
 «  ! Derivational prefix
 »  ! Derivational suffix
 %< ! Inflectional prefix
 %> ! Inflectional suffix
 #  ! Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds

 ! Escaped chars
 %  

        !! ## Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc):
 »7     !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  Literal »
 «7     !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  Literal «
        !! ```
 %[%>%] !!= @CODE@ - Literal >
 %[%<%] !!= @CODE@ - Literal <
        !! ```
%^√:0  !!≈ * **@CODE@**: at commence of root


%- !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  hyphen

;


Sets

 Vow = a e i o u y ə
       á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì â ê ô û î ã ý ;

 CnsNoGlotOrD = b c f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z 
š ǰ  č
c̓
č̓
dᶻ
gʷ
ɬ
l
l̕
ƛ̕
w̓
t̕
y̓
p̓
k̓
kʷ
k̓ʷ
q
qʷ
q̓
q̓ʷ
xʷ
x̌
x̌ʷ
b̓
n̓
m̓

ɬ
ƛ̕


;

Cns = CnsNoGlotOrD ʔ d ;

Lts = Cns Vow ;


!! Reduplications are worked with on the basis of the Lushootseed Dictionary by Dawn Bates, Thom Hess and Vi Hilbert. Seattle & London. 1994:xvii

!! Red1
!! C V1 => C V1 C V1 
!!€ s%^√{p6}%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}tubš
!!€ s0000tu0tubš 
!!€ ʔiɬ%^√{p6}%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}t̕isu
!!€ ʔiɬ0000t̕i0t̕isu

!! C V1 => C V1 C ə  
!!€ s%^√{p6}%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}tuləkʷ
!!€ s0000tu0tələkʷ
!!€ {p6}%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}yubil
!!€ 000yu0yəbil
!!€ {p6}%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ɬaɬil
!!€ 000ɬa0ɬəlil
!!€ {p6}%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}k̓ʷid
!!€ 000k̓ʷi0k̓ʷəd

!! C V1 => C V1 C   
!!€ {p6}%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}pastəd
!!€ 000pa0p0stəd
!!€ s%^√{p6}%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌ʷiƛ̕əyʔ 
!!€ s0000x̌ʷi0x̌ʷ0ƛ̕əyʔ

!! C ə => C i C   %^Red1i13:
!!€ {p6}%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ʔəpus%^Red1i13
!!€ 000ʔi0ʔ0pus0

!! C ə => C i C ə
!! Red 1 qəlb: qiqəlb %^Red1i123
!!€ {p6}%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}qəlb%^Red1i123
!!€ 000qi0qəlb0

Rules


! Vowels
"a:0 in inflection"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 a:0 <=>
        _ d: %^Pen: %^RmVOW: %^d2t: %>  ; !-t-əb Passive
    [%^Red1i13:|%^RedPL1i1i13:|%^Red1iq13:|%^Red12q13:|%^Red1213:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:)  Cns _ [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* ;
    
"ə:0 in inflection"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 ə:0 <=>  _ d: %> c: Vow ;!CHECKME
!!€ x̌əd»əd%>sid
!!€ x̌əd000%>cid
        _ d: %^Pen: %^RmVOW: %^d2t: %>  ; !-t-əb Passive
!echo 'b ə q̓ ə:0 d:t ^Pen:0 ^RmVOW:0 ^d2t:0 > ə b' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst
!!€ bəq̓əd^Pen^RmVOW^d2t>əb
!!€ bəq̓0t000>əb

   [%^Red1i13:|%^RedPL1i1i13:|%^Red1iq13:|%^Red12q13:|%^Red1213:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cns _ [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* ;
!! sčətxʷəd+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl __bear/karhu__
!!€ s%^√{p6}%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}čətxʷəd%^RedPL1i1i13
!!€ s%^√čiči0č0txʷəd0

"i:0 in inflection"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 i:0 <=>  [%^Red1i13:|%^RedPL1i1i13:|%^Red1iq13:|%^Red12q13:|%^Red1213:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:)  Cns _ [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* ;

"í:0 in inflection"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 í:0 <=>  [%^Red1i13:|%^RedPL1i1i13:|%^Red1iq13:|%^Red12q13:|%^Red1213:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cns _ [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* ;

! Vowels
"ʔ:0 in preceding s"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 ʔ:0 <=> s [%< | %^√: ] _ u %< ;
!! ʔəɬəd+V+Prf+Der+Der/N+N+Sg+PxSg2: __eat/syödä__
!!€ ad<s<ʔu<ʔəɬəd
!!€ ad<s<0u<ʔəɬəd
      [ ƛ̕ | t ] u: %< _ a s %< ;
  %^Red12323:  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) _ Vow: [ Lts | » ]* ; ! see Cns:0 in reduplication 3 and 5
!!

"u:0 in preceding ƛ̕"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 u:0 <=> [ ƛ̕ | t ] _ %< ʔ: a s ;


!"ə:i in reduplication"
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! ə:i <=>
!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] Cns _ 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: Cns _ 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;

"%{pØ%}:a in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{pØ%}:a <=> [%^RedPL130130:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: %{p1%}: _  Cns: Cns: [a|á:] [ Lts: | » ]* ;




"%{p2%}:ə in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p2%}:ə <=> [%^RedPL123123:|%^Red12323:|%^Red12123:|%^Red12q13:|%^Red1213:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: _ %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cns: ə Cns: [ Lts: | » ]* ;
!!€ {p6}%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bəlups%^RedPL123123
!!€ 00bəlbəlups0

"%{p2%}:u in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p2%}:u <=> [%^RedPL123123:|%^Red12323:|%^Red12123:|%^Red12q13:|%^Red1213:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: _ %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cns: u Cns: [ Lts: | » ]* ;


"%{p2%}:í in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p2%}:í <=>  [%^RedPL123123:|%^Red12323:|%^Red12123:|%^Red12q13:|%^Red1213:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: _ %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cns: í: Cns: [ Lts: | » ]* ;

"%{p2%}:i in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p2%}:i <=>  [%^RedPL123123:|%^Red12323:|%^RedPL1i1i13:|%^Red1i13:|%^Red1iq13:|%^Red1iq123:|%^Red12123:|%^Red12q13:|%^Red1213:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: _ %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cns: i: Cns: [ Lts: | » ]* ;
        [%^RedPL1i1i13:|%^Red1i13:|%^Red1iq13:|%^Red1iq123:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: _ %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:)  Cns: ə: Cns: [ Lts: | » ]* ;
               [%^Red1i123:|%^Red1iq13:|%^Red1iq123:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: _ %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cns: ə Cns: [ Lts: | » ]* ; 
               [%^Red1i123:|%^Red1iq13:|%^Red1iq123:|%^Red1i13:|%^RedPL1i1i13:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: _ %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cns: [a:|u:|i:|á:|à:|í:|ì:|ú:|ù:] Cns: [ Lts: | » ]* ; 

!!€ ^Red1iq13{p6}{p5}{p4}{p3}{p2}{p1}x̌aʔx̌aʔ
!!€ 000x̌iʔx̌0ʔx̌aʔ
!! qəlb+N+Pl: **rain showers**
!!€ ^Red1i123{p6}{p5}{p4}{p3}{p2}{p1}qəlb
!!€ 000qi0qəlb
!! pišpiš+N+Pl: **cat/kissa**
!!€ ^RedPL123123{p6}{p5}{p4}{p3}{p2}{p1}pišpiš
!!€ 000pišpišpiš

"%{p5%}:i in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p5%}:i <=> %^RedPL1i1i13:  %{p6%}: _ %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cns: ə: Cns: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* ;
              %^RedPL1i1i13:  %{p6%}: _ %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cns: [i:|í:] Cns: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* ;

"%{p2%}:a in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p2%}:a <=> [%^RedPL123123:|%^Red12323:|%^Red12123:|%^Red12q13:|%^Red1213:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: _ %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cns:  a  Cns: [ Lts: | » ]* ;

"%{p2%}:á in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p2%}:á <=> [%^RedPL123123:|%^Red12323:|%^Red12123:|%^Red12q13:|%^Red1213:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: _ %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cns:  á:  Cns: [ Lts: | » ]* ;

"%{pØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{pØ%}:0 <=> \[ %^RedPL130130:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: %{p1%}: _ [ Lts: | » ]* [ # | %>: ] ;


"%{p1%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p1%}:0 <=> (%^RedPL1i1i13: | %^Red1i13: |%^Red1213:|%^Red12123:)  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) [ Lts: | » ]+ [  # | %>: ] ;

"%{p2%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p2%}:0 <=>  \[ %^RedPL1i1i13: | %^Red1i13: | %^RedPL123123: | %^Red12323: |%^Red12q13:|%^Red1213:| %^Red1i123: |%^Red12123:| %^Red1iq13:|%^Red1iq123:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: _ %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) [ Lts: | » ]* [ # | %>: ] ;
!  \[ %^RedPL1i1i13: | %^Red1i13: | %^RedPL123123: | %^Red12323: | %^Red1i123: |%^Red12123:| %^Red1iq13:|%^Red1iq123:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: _ %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) [ Lts: | » ]* [ # | %>: ] ;
      %^RedPL130130:  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: _ %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cns: Cns: Vow: [ Lts: | » ]* ;   

"%{p3%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p3%}:0 <=>  \[ %^RedPL1i1i13: | %^Red1i13: | %^RedPL123123: | %^Red12323: | %^Red1i123: |%^Red1iq13:|%^Red1iq123:|%^Red12123:|%^RedPL130130:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: %{p4%}: _ %{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) [ Lts: | » ]* [ # | %>: ] ;


"%{p4%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p4%}:0 <=> \[ %^Red12323123:]  %{p6%}: %{p5%}: _ %{p3%}: %{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) [ Lts: | » ]* [ # | %>: ] ;
 
"%{p5%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p5%}:0 <=> (%^RedPL123123: | %^Red12323: | %^Red1i13: | %^Red1iq13:|%^Red1iq123:|%^Red12123:|%^Red12q13:|%^Red1213:|%^RedPL130130:)  %{p6%}: _ %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) [ Lts: | » ]*  [  # | %>: ] ;

"%{p6%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p6%}:0 <=>  (%^RedPL123123: | %^Red12323: | %^Red1i13: |%^Red1iq13:|%^Red1iq123:|%^Red12123:|%^Red12q13:|%^Red1213:|%^RedPL130130:) _ %{p5%}: %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) [ Lts: | » ]* [ # | %>: ];


!!! ### CONSONANTS
!"s:c after d:0"
!!! **@RULENAME@**
!s:c <=> d: %> _ # ;

!!€ ʔu%^√{p6}%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}kʷədad%>s
!!€ ʔu000000kʷəda0%>c
